Hawaii statutes.
§196-4 Powers and duties. Subject to
the approval of the governor, the coordinator shall:

(1) Formulate plans, including objectives, criteria
to measure accomplishment of objectives, programs through which the objectives
are to be attained, and financial requirements for the optimum development of
Hawaii's energy resources;

(2) Conduct systematic analysis of existing and
proposed energy resource programs, evaluate the analysis conducted by
government agencies and other organizations and recommend programs that
represent the most effective allocation of resources for the development of
energy resources;

(3) Formulate and recommend specific proposals, as
necessary, for conserving energy resources, including the allocation and
distribution thereof;

(4) Assist public and private agencies in
implementing energy conservation and efficiency programs, the development of
indigenous energy resources, and related measures;

(5) Coordinate the State's energy programs with those
of the federal government, other state governments, governments of nations with
interest in common energy resources, and the political subdivisions of the
State;

(6) Develop programs to encourage private and public
exploration, research, and development of indigenous energy resources that will
benefit the State;

(7) Conduct public education programs to inform the
public of the energy resources situation, as it may exist, from time to time
and of the government actions taken;

(8) Serve as consultant to the governor, public
agencies, and private industry on energy-related matters;

(9) Contract for services when required for the
implementation of this chapter;

(10) Review proposed state actions that the
coordinator finds to have significant effect on the State's energy objectives
and report to the governor their effect on the energy program, and perform
other services as may be required by the governor and the legislature;

(11) Prepare and submit an annual report and other
reports as may be requested to the governor and to the legislature on the
implementation of this chapter and all matters related to energy resources;

(12) Formulate a systematic process, including the
development of requirements, to identify geographic areas that are rich with
renewable energy resource potential that can be developed in a cost-effective
and environmentally benign manner and designate these areas as renewable energy
zones;

(13) Develop and recommend incentives, plans, and
programs to encourage the development of renewable energy resource projects
within the renewable energy zones;

(14) Assist public and private agencies in identifying
utility transmission projects or infrastructure required to accommodate and
facilitate the development of renewable energy resources;

(15) Assist public and private agencies, in
coordination with the department of budget and finance, in accessing the use of
special purpose revenue bonds to finance the engineering, design, and
construction of transmission projects and infrastructure that are deemed
critical to the development of renewable energy resources;

(16) Develop the criteria or requirements for
identifying and qualifying specific transmission projects and infrastructure
that are critical to the development of renewable energy resources, including
providing assistance in accessing the use of special purpose revenue bonds to
finance the projects or infrastructure;

(17) Develop and maintain a comprehensive and
systematic quantitative and qualitative capacity to analyze the status of
energy resources, systems, and markets, both in-state and those to which Hawaii
is directly tied, particularly in relation to the State's economy, and to
recommend, develop proposals for, and assess the effectiveness of policy and
regulatory decisions, and conduct energy emergency planning; and

(18) Adopt rules for the administration of this
chapter pursuant to chapter 91. [L 1974, c 237, §4; am L 1978, c 136, §2; gen
ch 1985; am L 2009, c 153, §4 and c 155, §5]

Cross References

County development of
alternative energy resources, see §46-19.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next